Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.400

Findings—Department's duty to promote agriculture, protect public health and welfare.

The history, economy, culture, and the future of Washington state to a large degree all involve agriculture, which is vital to the economic well-being of the state. The legislature finds that farmers and ranchers are responsible stewards of the land, but are increasingly subjected to complaints and unwarranted restrictions that encourage, and even force, the premature removal of lands from agricultural uses.

The legislature further finds that it is now in the overriding public interest that support for agriculture be clearly expressed and that adequate protection be given to agricultural lands, uses, activities, and operations.

The legislature further finds that the department of agriculture has a duty to promote and protect agriculture and its dependent rural community in Washington state however, the duty shall not be construed as to diminish the responsibility of the department to fully carry out its assigned regulatory responsibilities to protect the public health and welfare.

[ 1994 c 46 s 9; 1991 c 280 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.